New York, session 2025-2026, A8470.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 and subdivision 2 of section 2 1328 of the public authorities law, paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 as 3 amended by chapter 44 of the laws of 2023, and subdivision 2 as added by 4 chapter 714 of the laws of 1970, are amended to read as follows: 5 (a) There is hereby created the central New York regional transporta- 6 tion authority. The authority shall be a body corporate and politic 7 constituting a public benefit corporation. It shall consist of not more 8 than [twelve] thirteen voting members, including a [chairman] chair and 9 shall have one non-voting member, as described in paragraph (b) of this 10 subdivision. At least one voting member shall be a transit dependent 11 individual who shall be appointed by the governor. If a vacancy occurs 12 for such transit dependent individual member position, a replacement 13 shall be appointed within six months, subject to the same appointment 14 process within this paragraph. The members shall be appointed by the 15 governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor 16 shall make initial appointments to the authority in such number and from 17 lists submitted as follows: three members shall be appointed to the 18 authority from a list of not less than six names, submitted to the 19 governor by the common council of the city of Syracuse, five members 20 from a list of not less than ten names, submitted by the legislature of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11126-05-6 A. 8470--B 2 1 the county of Onondaga and two members shall be appointed from a list of 2 not less than four names submitted by the legislature of the county of 3 Oneida. Other counties electing to participate shall each submit to the 4 governor a list of not less than two persons for each one hundred thou- 5 sand or major fraction of the total population, as determined by the 6 nineteen hundred seventy or any subsequent federal decennial or federal 7 county-wide special census, of the counties outside the county of Onon- 8 daga which shall elect to participate, from which number the governor 9 shall appoint one member for each one hundred thousand or major fraction 10 of the total population, as determined by such federal decennial or 11 federal county-wide special census, with a maximum of three members to 12 represent such counties outside the county of Onondaga so electing to 13 participate. In addition to the members specified above, the governor 14 shall appoint a transit dependent individual as a voting member who 15 resides within a county within the district. Any local or statewide 16 transit advocacy organization may recommend one or more transit depend- 17 ent individuals to be considered for appointment pursuant to this 18 section. 19 2. The members of the authority shall continue in office until their 20 successors are appointed and shall have qualified. One member recom- 21 mended by the common council of the city of Syracuse and one member 22 recommended by the legislature of the county of Onondaga shall be 23 appointed for terms ending July thirty-first, nineteen hundred seventy- 24 five; one member recommended by the common council of the city of Syra- 25 cuse and two members recommended by the legislature of the county of 26 Onondaga shall be appointed for terms ending July thirty-first, nineteen 27 hundred seventy-six; and one member recommended by the common council of 28 the city of Syracuse and two members recommended by the legislature of 29 the county of Onondaga shall be appointed for terms ending July thirty- 30 first, nineteen hundred seventy-seven. The member (or members) who is 31 (or are) recommended by the other county legislatures or board of super- 32 visors shall be appointed for a term (or terms) of seven years, but all 33 terminating on the thirty-first day of July of the seventh year. There- 34 after, upon expiration of the term of a member of the authority a 35 successor shall be appointed by the governor for a term expiring seven 36 years after the expiration of the term of [his] such member's predeces- 37 sor. If a vacancy shall occur by reason of death, disqualification, 38 resignation or removal of a member, the successor shall be appointed by 39 the governor for the unexpired term. Persons succeeding members recom- 40 mended by the appropriate legislative bodies of the city of Syracuse and 41 the counties of Onondaga and Oneida on the authority shall be appointed 42 by the same procedure as the original appointments. The same procedure 43 shall be followed for the filling of vacancies of members appointed from 44 other counties. Members of the authority shall, before entering upon the 45 duties of their office, take the constitutional oath of office and file 46 the same in the office of the secretary of state. 47 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 48 have been in full force and effect on and after March 31, 2025.